Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-233
Supreme Court Operations Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Supreme Court Operations Cash Fund is created. The State Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall be used for court and probation programs that enhance the administration of justice and improve community safety. The fund shall consist of fees, grants, donations, gifts, and payments received pursuant to contractual agreements with political subdivisions for court services. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2026, LB952, § 1.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.